Mississippi, session 2026, SB2476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Mississippi Board of Pharmacy may establish by rule an alternative-to-discipline program for licensees who have an impairment as a result of substance abuse or a mental health condition.  Any such program shall include, but not be limited to, the following criteria: (a)  The licensee's participation in the program must be voluntary, and the licensee must enter the program before the board holds a disciplinary action hearing regarding the licensee; (b)  The licensee may be required to contribute to the cost of participation in the program, including the cost of any care, counseling, treatment and/or education received by the licensee; and (c)  All of the procedures and records regarding the licensee's participation in the program shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.